Utah statutes.
72-2-112.   Transportation department authorized to participate in federal program -- Prohibition against spending certain transportation funds.

(1)  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the department is empowered to participate in the deferred payment program authorized by Congress in Public Law 94-30.

(2)  Any indebtedness incurred by the department under this section shall be paid from state transportation funds as appropriated.

(3) (a)  As used in this Subsection (3):

(i)  "Apportioned" means divided or assigned among the states based on a prescribed formula established in 23 U.S.C.

(ii)  "Authorization act" means an act of Congress enacted after July 1, 2009 that authorizes transportation programs from the Highway Trust Fund established in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 9503.

(b)  The state, including any agency, department, or division of the state, may not spend project-specific funds that are allocated through an authorization act for a transportation-related project that is eligible for funds apportioned to the state in support of the statewide transportation improvement program unless the specified project is included on the statewide transportation improvement program.

